Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-428
Respite care service, defined.

(1) Respite care service means (a) a person or any legal entity that provides short-term temporary care on an intermittent basis to persons with special needs when the person's primary caregiver is unavailable to provide such care or (b) a residential facility that provides short-term housing with supportive medical services to homeless individuals as described in section 68-911.

(2) Respite care service does not include:

(a) A person or any legal entity which is licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act and which provides respite care services at the licensed location;

(b) A person or legal entity which is licensed to provide child care to thirteen or more children under the Child Care Licensing Act or which is licensed as a residential child-caring agency under the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act;

(c) An agency that recruits, screens, or trains a person to provide respite care;

(d) An agency that matches a respite care service or other providers of respite care with a person with special needs, or refers a respite care service or other providers of respite care to a person with special needs, unless the agency receives compensation for such matching or referral from the service or provider or from or on behalf of the person with special needs;

(e) A person who provides respite care to fewer than eight unrelated persons in any seven-day period in his or her home or in the home of the recipient of the respite care; or

(f) A nonprofit agency that provides group respite care for no more than eight hours in any seven-day period.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 28;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 40;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 43;

Laws 2005, LB 2, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB265, § 39;

Laws 2024, LB905, § 3.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.

Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act, see section 71-1924.